California statutes. Probate Code
(1) An action or inaction that resulted in a lien or encumbrance being recorded against the property.

(2) The receipt of income from the property, if that income would have accrued to the estate had the property not been transferred to the transferee.

(c) The personal representative shall provide the transferee a written statement of any reimbursement or liability under this section, along with a statement of the reasons for the reimbursement or liability.

(d) For the purposes of Section 11420, reimbursement of the transferee under subdivision (a) shall be deemed an expense of administration.

(e) In the event that the transferee and the personal representative cannot agree on the reimbursement or liability due under this section, the transferee or personal representative may petition the court for an order determining the amount of the reimbursement or liability. In making a decision under this subdivision, the court should consider the surrounding circumstances,
 including whether the parties acted in good faith and whether a particular result would impose an unfair burden on the transferee or the estate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 29, Sec. 23.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13209.

If transferred property is returned to the estate under Sections 13205.5 or 13206, the value of that property shall be included in the total value of the estate, for all purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 29, Sec. 24.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13210.

The procedure provided by this chapter may be used only if one of the following requirements is satisfied:

(a) No proceeding for the administration of the decedent’s estate is pending or has been conducted in this state. 

(b) The decedent’s personal representative consents in writing to use of the procedure provided by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

13211.

If the court finds that a person designated as a successor of the decedent in a certified copy of an affidavit issued under Section 13202 has acted reasonably and in good faith under the circumstances as known to the person, the court may, in its discretion, excuse the person from liability to pay interest, in whole or in part, under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 13206 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 13206, if it would be equitable to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 29, Sec. 25.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. PASSAGE OF PROPERTY TO SURVIVING SPOUSE WITHOUT ADMINISTRATION [13500. - 13660.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [13500. - 13506.]

13500.

Except as provided in this chapter, when a spouse dies intestate leaving property that passes to the surviving spouse under Section 6401, or dies testate and by his or her will devises all or a part of his or her property to the surviving spouse, the property passes to the survivor subject to the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13540) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13550), and no administration is necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 89.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13501.

Except as provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6600) of Division 6 and in Part 1 (commencing with Section 13000) of this division, the following property of the decedent is subject to administration under this code:

(a) Property passing to someone other than the surviving spouse under the decedent’s will or by intestate succession.

(b) Property disposed of in trust under the decedent’s will.

(c) Property in which the decedent’s will limits the surviving spouse to a qualified ownership. For the purposes of this subdivision, a devise to the surviving spouse that is conditioned on the spouse surviving the decedent by a specified period of time is not a “qualified ownership” interest if the specified period of time has expired.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13502.

(a) Upon the election of the surviving spouse or the personal representative, guardian of the estate, or conservator of the estate of the surviving spouse, all or a portion of the following property may be administered under this code:

(1) The one-half of the community property that belongs to the decedent under Section 100, the one-half of the quasi-community property that belongs to the decedent under Section 101, and the separate property of the decedent.

(2) The one-half of the community property that belongs to the surviving spouse under Section 100 and the one-half of the quasi-community property that belongs to the surviving spouse under Section 101.

(b) The election shall be made by a writing specifically evidencing the election filed in the proceedings for the administration of the estate of the deceased spouse within four months after the issuance of letters, or within any further time that the court may allow upon a showing of good cause, and before entry of an order under Section 13656.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13502.5.

(a) Upon a petition by the personal representative of a decedent and a showing of good cause, the court may order that a pecuniary devise to the surviving spouse, or a fractional interest passing to the surviving spouse in any property in which the remaining fraction is subject to the administration, may be administered under this code, except to the extent that it has passed by inheritance as determined by an order pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13650).

(b) Notice of this petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220 to the person designated in that section and to the surviving spouse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 871, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

13503.

(a) The surviving spouse or the personal representative, guardian of the estate, or conservator of the estate of the surviving spouse may file an election and agreement to have all or part of the one-half of the community property that belongs to the surviving spouse under Section 100 and the one-half of the quasi-community property that belongs to the surviving spouse under Section 101 transferred by the surviving spouse or the surviving spouse’s personal representative, guardian, or conservator to the trustee under the will of the deceased spouse or the trustee of an existing trust identified by the will of the deceased spouse, to be administered and distributed by the trustee.

(b) The election and agreement shall be filed in the proceedings for the administration of the estate of the deceased spouse and before the entry of the order for final distribution in the proceedings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13504.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this part, community property held in a revocable trust described in Section 761 of the Family Code is governed by the provisions, if any, in the trust for disposition in the event of death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 61.6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

13505.

This part applies whether the deceased spouse died before, on, or after July 1, 1987.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13506.

A reference in any statute of this state or in a written instrument, including a will or trust, to a provision of former Sections 202 to 206, inclusive, of the Probate Code (as repealed by Chapter 527 of the Statutes of 1984) or former Sections 649.1 to 649.5, inclusive, or Sections 650 to 658, inclusive, of the Probate Code (as repealed by Chapter 783 of the Statutes of 1986) shall be deemed to be a reference to the comparable provision of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Right of Surviving Spouse to Dispose of Property [13540. - 13545.]

13540.

(a) Except as provided in Section 13541, after 40 days from the death of a spouse, the surviving spouse or the personal representative, guardian of the estate, or conservator of the estate of the surviving spouse has full power to sell, convey, lease, mortgage, or otherwise deal with and dispose of the community or quasi-community real property, and the right, title, and interest of any grantee, purchaser, encumbrancer, or lessee shall be free of rights of the estate of the deceased spouse or of devisees or creditors of the deceased spouse to the same extent as if the property had been owned as the separate property of the surviving spouse. 

(b) The surviving spouse or the personal representative, guardian of the estate, or conservator of the estate of the surviving spouse may record, prior to or together with the instrument that makes a disposition of property under this section, an affidavit of the facts that establish the right of the surviving spouse to make the disposition.

(c) Nothing in this section affects or limits the liability of the surviving spouse under Sections 13550 to 13553, inclusive, and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 13560).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 806, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

13541.

(a) Section 13540 does not apply to a sale, conveyance, lease, mortgage, or other disposition that takes place after a notice that satisfies the requirements of this section is recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which real property is located. 

(b) The notice shall contain all of the following: 

(1) A description of the real property in which an interest is claimed. 

(2) A statement that an interest in the property is claimed by a named person under the will of the deceased spouse. 

(3) The name or names of the owner or owners of the record title to the property. 

(c) There shall be endorsed on the notice instructions that it shall be indexed by the recorder in the name or names of the owner or owners of record title to the property, as grantor or grantors, and in the name of the person claiming an interest in the property, as grantee. 

(d) A person shall not record a notice under this section for the purpose of slandering title to the property. If the court in an action or proceeding relating to the rights of the parties determines that a person recorded a notice under this section for the purpose of slandering title, the court shall award against the person the cost of the action or proceeding, including a reasonable attorney’s fee, and the damages caused by the recording.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 55.)
-------------------------------------------

13542.

The repeal of former Section 649.2 by Chapter 783 of the Statutes of 1986 does not affect any sale, lease, mortgage, or other transaction or disposition of real property made prior to July 1, 1987, to which that section applied, and such a sale, lease, mortgage, or other transaction or disposition shall continue to be governed by the provisions of former Section 649.2 notwithstanding the repeal of that section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13545.

(a) After the death of a spouse, the surviving spouse, or the personal representative, guardian of the estate, or conservator of the estate of the surviving spouse has full power to sell, assign, pledge, or otherwise deal with and dispose of community or quasi-community property securities registered in the name of the surviving spouse alone, and the right, title, and interest of any purchaser, assignee, encumbrancer, or other transferee shall be free of the rights of the estate of the deceased spouse or of devisees or creditors of the deceased spouse to the same extent as if the deceased spouse had not died. 

(b) Nothing in this section affects or limits the liability of a surviving spouse under Sections 13550 to 13553, inclusive, and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 13560).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Liability for Debts of Deceased Spouse [13550. - 13554.]

13550.

Except as provided in Sections 11446, 13552, 13553, and 13554, upon the death of a married person, the surviving spouse is personally liable for the debts of the deceased spouse chargeable against the property described in Section 13551 to the extent provided in Section 13551.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13551.

The liability imposed by Section 13550 shall not exceed the fair market value at the date of the decedent’s death, less the amount of any liens and encumbrances, of the total of the following:

(a) The portion of the one-half of the community and quasi-community property belonging to the surviving spouse under Sections 100 and 101 that is not exempt from enforcement of a money judgment and is not administered in the estate of the deceased spouse.

(b) The portion of the one-half of the community and quasi-community property belonging to the decedent under Sections 100 and 101 that passes to the surviving
 spouse without
 administration under this part.

(c) The separate property of the decedent that passes to the surviving spouse without administration under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 29, Sec. 26.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13552.

If proceedings are commenced in this state for the administration of the estate of the deceased spouse and the time for filing claims has commenced, any action upon the liability of the surviving spouse pursuant to Section 13550 is barred to the same extent as provided for claims under Part 4 (commencing with Section 9000) of Division 7, except as to the following:

(a) Creditors who commence judicial proceedings for the enforcement of the debt and serve the surviving spouse with the complaint therein prior to the expiration of the time for filing claims.

(b) Creditors who have or who secure the surviving spouse’s acknowledgment in writing of the liability of the surviving spouse for the debts.

(c) Creditors who file a timely claim in the proceedings for the administration of the estate of the deceased spouse.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13553.

The surviving spouse is not liable under this chapter if all the property described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 13502 is administered under this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13554.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any debt described in Section 13550 may be enforced against the surviving spouse in the same manner as it could have been enforced against the deceased spouse if the deceased spouse had not died.

(b) In any action or proceeding based upon the debt, the surviving spouse may assert any defense, cross-complaint, or setoff which would have been available to the deceased spouse if the deceased spouse had not died.

(c) Section 366.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure applies in an action under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 178, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Liability for Decedent’s Property [13560. - 13565.]

13560.

For the purposes of this chapter, “decedent’s property” means the one-half of the community property that belongs to the decedent under Section 100 and the one-half of the quasi-community property that belongs to the decedent under Section 101.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 57.)
-------------------------------------------

13561.

(a) If the decedent’s property is in the possession or control of the surviving spouse at the time of the decedent’s death, the surviving spouse is personally liable to the extent provided in Section 13563 to any person having a superior right by testate succession from the decedent. 

(b) An action to impose liability under this section is forever barred three years after the death of the decedent. The three-year period specified in this subdivision is not tolled for any reason.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 57.)
-------------------------------------------

13562.

(a) Subject to subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), if proceedings for the administration of the decedent’s estate are commenced, the surviving spouse is liable for:

(1) The restitution to the decedent’s estate of the decedent’s property if the surviving spouse still has the decedent’s property, together with (A) the net income the surviving spouse received from the decedent’s property and (B) if the surviving spouse encumbered the decedent’s property after the date of death, the amount necessary to satisfy the balance of the encumbrance as of the date the decedent’s property is restored to the estate.

(2) The restitution to the
 decedent’s estate of the fair market value of the decedent’s property if the surviving spouse no longer has the decedent’s property, together with (A) the net income the surviving spouse received from the decedent’s property prior to disposing of it and (B) interest from the date of disposition at the rate of 7 percent per annum on the fair market value of the decedent’s property. For the purposes of this paragraph, the “fair market value of the decedent’s property” is the fair market value of the decedent’s property, determined as of the time of the disposition of the decedent’s property, less the amount of any liens and encumbrances on the decedent’s property at the time of the decedent’s death.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), if proceedings for the administration of the decedent’s estate are commenced and the surviving spouse made
 a significant improvement to the decedent’s property in the good faith belief that the surviving spouse was the successor of the decedent to the decedent’s property, the surviving spouse is liable for whichever of the following the decedent’s estate elects:

(1) The restitution of the decedent’s property, as improved, to the estate of the decedent upon the condition that the estate reimburse the surviving spouse for (A) the amount by which the improvement increases the fair market value of the decedent’s property restored, valued as of the time of restitution, and (B) the amount paid by the surviving spouse for principal and interest on any liens or encumbrances that were on the decedent’s property at the time of the decedent’s death.

(2) The restoration to the decedent’s
 estate of the fair market value of the decedent’s property, valued as of the time of the decedent’s death, excluding the amount of any liens and encumbrances on the decedent’s property at that time, together with interest on the net amount at the rate of 7 percent per annum running from the date of the decedent’s death.

(c) The property and amount required to be restored to the estate under this section shall be reduced by any property or amount paid by the surviving spouse to satisfy a liability under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13550).

(d) An action to enforce the liability under this section may be brought only by the personal representative of the estate of the decedent. Whether or not the personal representative brings an action under this section, the personal
 representative may enforce the liability only to the extent necessary to protect the interests of the heirs, devisees, and creditors of the decedent.

(e) An action to enforce the liability under this section is forever barred three years after the death of the decedent. The three-year period specified in this subdivision is not tolled for any reason.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 122, Sec. 17.   (AB 473)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13563.

(a) The surviving spouse is not liable under Section 13561 if proceedings for the administration of the decedent’s estate are commenced and the surviving spouse satisfies the requirements of Section 13562.

(b) The aggregate of the personal liability of the surviving spouse under Section 13561 shall not exceed the sum of the following:

(1) The fair market value at the time of the decedent’s death, less the amount of any liens and encumbrances on the decedent’s property at that time, of the portion of the decedent’s property that passes to any person having a superior right by testate
 succession from the decedent.

(2) The net income the surviving spouse received from the portion of the decedent’s property that passes to any person having a superior right by testate succession from the decedent.

(3) If the decedent’s property has been disposed of, interest on the fair market value of the portion of the decedent’s property that passes to any person having a superior right by testate succession from the decedent from the date of disposition at the rate of 7 percent per annum. For the purposes of this paragraph, “fair market value” is fair market value, determined as of the time of disposition of the decedent’s property, less the amount of any liens and encumbrances on the decedent’s
 property at the time of the decedent’s death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 122, Sec. 18.   (AB 473)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13564.

The remedies available under Sections 13561 to 13563, inclusive, are in addition to any remedies available by reason of any fraud or intentional wrongdoing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 57.)
-------------------------------------------

13565.

If the court finds that the surviving spouse has acted reasonably and in good faith under the circumstances as known to the surviving spouse, the court may, in its discretion, excuse the surviving spouse from liability to pay interest, in whole or in part, under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 13562, paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 13562, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 13563, if it would be equitable to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 122, Sec. 19.   (AB 473)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Collection by Affidavit of Compensation Owed to Deceased Spouse [13600. - 13606.]

13600.

(a) At any time after a spouse dies, the surviving spouse or the guardian or conservator of the estate of the surviving spouse may, without procuring letters of administration or awaiting probate of the will, collect salary or other compensation owed by an employer for personal services of the deceased spouse, including compensation for unused vacation, not in excess of sixteen thousand six hundred twenty-five dollars ($16,625), as adjusted periodically in accordance with Section 890, net.

(b) Not more than sixteen thousand six hundred twenty-five dollars ($16,625), as adjusted periodically in accordance with Section 890, net in the aggregate may be collected by or for the
 surviving spouse under this chapter from all of the employers of the decedent.

(c) For the purposes of this chapter, a guardian or conservator of the estate of the surviving spouse may act on behalf of the surviving spouse without authorization or approval of the court in which the guardianship or conservatorship proceeding is pending.

(d) The dollar limit set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) does not apply to the surviving spouse or the guardian or conservator of the estate of the surviving spouse of a firefighter or peace officer described in subdivision (a) of Section 22820 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 122, Sec. 20.   (AB 473)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13601.

(a) To collect salary or other compensation under this chapter, an affidavit or a declaration under penalty of perjury under the laws of this state shall be furnished to the employer of the deceased spouse stating all of the following:

(1) The name of the decedent.

(2) The date and place of the decedent’s death.

(3) Either of the following, as appropriate:

(A) “The affiant or declarant is the surviving spouse of the decedent.”

(B) “The
 affiant or declarant is the guardian or conservator of the estate of the surviving spouse of the decedent.”

(4) “The surviving spouse of the decedent is entitled to the earnings of the decedent under the decedent’s will or by intestate succession and no one else has a superior right to the earnings.”

(5) “No proceeding is now being or has been conducted in California for administration of the decedent’s estate.”

(6) “Sections 13600 to 13605, inclusive, of the California Probate Code require that the earnings of the decedent, including compensation for unused vacation, not in excess of [Insert dollar amount specified in subdivision (e) of Section 13601 of the California Probate Code] net, be paid promptly to the affiant or
 declarant.”

(7) “Neither the surviving spouse, nor anyone acting on behalf of the surviving spouse, has a pending request to collect compensation owed by another employer for personal services of the decedent under Sections 13600 to 13605, inclusive, of the California Probate Code.”

(8) “Neither the surviving spouse, nor anyone acting on behalf of the surviving spouse, has collected any compensation owed by an employer for personal services of the decedent under Sections 13600 to 13605, inclusive, of the California Probate Code except the sum of ____ dollars ($____) that was collected from ____.”

(9) “The affiant or declarant requests that the affiant or declarant be paid the salary or other compensation owed by you
 for personal services of the decedent, including compensation for unused vacation, not to exceed [Insert dollar amount specified in subdivision (e) of Section 13601 of the California Probate Code] net, less the amount of ____ dollars ($____) that was previously collected.”

(10) “The affiant or declarant affirms or declares under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of California that the foregoing is true and correct.”

(b) Where the decedent is a firefighter or peace officer described in subdivision (a) of Section 22820 of the Government Code, the affidavit or declaration need not include the content specified in paragraphs (6) to (9), inclusive, of subdivision (a). The affidavit shall instead include the following statements:

(1) “The decedent was a firefighter or peace officer described in subdivision (a) of Section 22820 of the Government Code. Sections 13600 to 13605, inclusive, of the California Probate Code require that the earnings of the decedent, including compensation for unused vacation, be paid promptly to the affiant or declarant.”

(2) “The affiant or declarant requests to be paid the salary or other compensation owed by you for personal services of the decedent, including compensation for unused vacation.”

(c) Reasonable proof of the identity of the surviving spouse shall be provided to the employer. If a guardian or conservator is acting for the surviving spouse, reasonable proof of the identity of the guardian or conservator shall also be provided to the employer. Proof of
 identity that is sufficient under Section 13104 is sufficient proof of identity for the purposes of this subdivision.

(d) If a person presenting the affidavit or declaration is a person claiming to be the guardian or conservator of the estate of the surviving spouse, the employer shall be provided with reasonable proof, satisfactory to the employer, of the appointment of the person to act as guardian or conservator of the estate of the surviving spouse.

(e) (1) When the decedent dies prior to April 1, 2022, the dollar amount for paragraphs (6) and (9) of subdivision (a) is sixteen thousand six hundred twenty-five dollars ($16,625).

(2) When the decedent dies on or after April 1, 2022, the dollar amount
 for paragraphs (6) and (9) of subdivision (a) is the adjusted dollar amount, published in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 890, in effect on the date of the decedent’s death. The affiant or declarant shall attach the list of adjusted dollar amounts, published in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 890, in effect on the date of the decedent’s death to the affidavit or declaration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 122, Sec. 21.   (AB 473)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13602.

If the requirements of Section 13600 are satisfied, the employer to whom the affidavit or declaration is presented shall promptly pay the earnings of the decedent, including compensation for unused vacation, as provided in Section 13600, to the person presenting the affidavit or declaration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 122, Sec. 22.   (AB 473)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13603.

If the requirements of Section 13601 are satisfied, receipt by the employer of the affidavit or declaration constitutes sufficient acquittance for the compensation paid pursuant to this chapter and discharges the employer from any further liability with respect to the compensation paid. The employer may rely in good faith on the statements in the affidavit or declaration and has no duty to inquire into the truth of any statement in the affidavit or declaration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13604.

(a) If the employer refuses to pay as required by this chapter, the surviving spouse may recover the amount the surviving spouse is entitled to receive under this chapter in an action brought for that purpose against the employer. 

(b) If an action is brought against the employer under this section, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the surviving spouse if the court finds that the employer acted unreasonably in refusing to pay as required by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13605.

(a) Nothing in this chapter limits the rights of the heirs or devisees of the deceased spouse. Payment of a decedent’s compensation pursuant to this chapter does not preclude later proceedings for administration of the decedent’s estate.

(b) Any person to whom payment is made under this chapter is answerable and accountable therefor to the personal representative of the decedent’s estate and is liable for the amount of the payment to any other person having a superior right to the payment received. In addition to any other liability the person has under this section, a person who fraudulently secures a payment under this chapter is liable to a person having a superior right to the payment for three times the amount of the payment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13606.

The procedure provided in this chapter is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other method of collecting compensation owed to a decedent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Determination or Confirmation of Property Passing or Belonging to Surviving Spouse [13650. - 13660.]

13650.

(a) A surviving spouse or the personal representative, guardian of the estate, or conservator of the estate of the surviving spouse may file a petition in the superior court of the county in which the estate of the deceased spouse may be administered requesting an order that administration of all or part of the estate is not necessary for the reason that all or part of the estate is property passing to the surviving spouse. The petition may also request an order confirming the ownership of the surviving spouse of property belonging to the surviving spouse under Section 100 or 101.

(b) To the extent of the election, this section does not apply to property that the petitioner has elected, as provided in Section 13502, to have administered under this code.

(c) A guardian or conservator may file a petition under this section without authorization or approval of the court in which the guardianship or conservatorship proceeding is pending.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13651.

(a) A petition filed pursuant to Section 13650 shall allege that administration of all or a part of the estate of the deceased spouse is not necessary for the reason that all or a part of the estate is property passing to the surviving spouse, and shall set forth all of the following information:

(1) If proceedings for the administration of the estate are not pending, the facts necessary to determine the county in which the estate of the deceased spouse may be administered.

(2) A description of the property of the deceased spouse which the petitioner alleges is property passing to the surviving spouse, including the trade or business name of any property passing to the surviving spouse that consists of an unincorporated business or an interest in an unincorporated business which the deceased spouse was operating or managing at the time of death, subject to any written agreement between the deceased spouse and the surviving spouse providing for a non pro rata division of the aggregate value of the community property assets or quasi-community assets, or both.

(3) The facts upon which the petitioner bases the allegation that all or a part of the estate of the deceased spouse is property passing to the surviving spouse.

(4) A description of any interest in the community property or quasi-community property, or both, which the petitioner requests the court to confirm to the surviving spouse as belonging to the surviving spouse pursuant to Section 100 or 101, subject to any written agreement between the deceased spouse and the surviving spouse providing for a non pro rata division of the aggregate value of the community property assets or quasi-community assets, or both.

(5) The name, age, address, and relation to the deceased spouse of each heir and devisee of the deceased spouse, the names and addresses of all persons named as executors of the will of the deceased spouse, and the names and addresses of all persons appointed as personal representatives of the deceased spouse, which are known to the petitioner.

Disclosure of any written agreement between the deceased spouse and the surviving spouse providing for a non pro rata division of the aggregate value of the community property assets or quasi-community property assets, or both, or the affirmative statement that this agreement does not exist. If a dispute arises as to the division of the community property assets or quasi-community property assets, or both, pursuant to this agreement, the court shall determine the division subject to terms and conditions or other remedies that appear equitable under the circumstances of the case, taking into account the rights of all interested persons.

(b) If the petitioner bases the allegation that all or part of the estate of the deceased spouse is property passing to the surviving spouse upon the will of the deceased spouse, a copy of the will shall be attached to the petition.

(c) If the petitioner bases the description of the property of the deceased spouse passing to the surviving spouse or the property to be confirmed to the surviving spouse, or both, upon a written agreement between the deceased spouse and the surviving spouse providing for a non pro rata division of the aggregate value of the community property assets or quasi-community assets, or both, a copy of the agreement shall be attached to the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 682, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13652.

If proceedings for the administration of the estate of the deceased spouse are pending, a petition under this chapter shall be filed in those proceedings without the payment of an additional fee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13653.

If proceedings for the administration of the estate of the deceased spouse are not pending, a petition under this chapter may, but need not, be filed with a petition for probate of the will of the deceased spouse or for administration of the estate of the deceased spouse.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13654.

The filing of a petition under this chapter does not preclude the court from admitting the will of the deceased spouse to probate or appointing a personal representative of the estate of the deceased spouse upon the petition of any person legally entitled, including any petition for probate of the will or for administration of the estate which is filed with a petition filed under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13655.

(a) If proceedings for the administration of the estate of the deceased spouse are pending at the time a petition is filed under this chapter, or if the proceedings are not pending and if the petition filed under this chapter is not filed with a petition for probate of the deceased spouse’s will or for administration of the estate of the deceased spouse, notice of the hearing on the petition filed under this chapter shall be given as provided in Section 1220 to all of the following persons:

(1) Each person listed in Section 1220 and each person named as executor in any will of the deceased spouse.

(2) All devisees and known heirs of the deceased spouse and, if the petitioner is the trustee of a trust that is a devisee under the will of the decedent, all persons interested in the trust, as determined in cases of future interests pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 15804.

(b) The notice specified in subdivision (a) shall also be delivered as provided in subdivision (a) to the Attorney General, addressed to the office of the Attorney General at Sacramento, if the petitioner bases the allegation that all or part of the estate of the deceased spouse is property passing to the surviving spouse upon the will of the deceased spouse and the will involves or may involve either of the following:

(1) A testamentary trust of property for
 charitable purposes other than a charitable trust with a designated trustee, resident in this state.

(2) A devise for a charitable purpose without an identified devisee or beneficiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 85.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13656.

(a) If the court finds that all of the estate of the deceased spouse is property passing to the surviving spouse, the court shall issue an order describing the property, determining that the property is property passing to the surviving spouse, and determining that no administration is necessary. The court may issue any further orders which may be necessary to cause delivery of the property or its proceeds to the surviving spouse.
